New York, session 2025-2026, S6267.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause 41 of subparagraph (i) of the opening paragraph of 2 section 1210 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 239 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 (41) the county of Delaware is hereby further authorized and empowered 5 to adopt and amend local laws, ordinances or resolutions imposing such 6 taxes at a rate which is one percent additional to the three percent 7 rate authorized above in this paragraph for such county for the period 8 beginning September first, two thousand two, and ending November thirti- 9 eth, two thousand [twenty-five] twenty-seven; 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10812-01-5